Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 3

Sexual Assault Program Services

71-6-301. Program established.

There is established a program for the establishment and funding of sexual assault program services to be administered by the department of finance and administration.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

Cross-References. Sexual assault program services, §40-24-108.

71-6-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the department of finance and administration;

“Sexual assault” includes victims of any of the sexual offenses set out in § 40-24-108(b)(2);

“Sexual assault crisis intervention” includes, but is not limited to:

A 24-hour hotline for victims of sexual assault staffed by a trained person;

Counseling for sexual assault victims and their families and friends;

Accompaniment of victims of sexual assault to courts, hospitals, district attorneys generals' offices, law enforcement, or victim/witness coordinators offices;

Information and referrals for victims of sexual assault;

Advocacy with law enforcement, criminal justice, medical, mental health, school, and other related systems on behalf of sexual assault victims; and

Educational programs for allied professionals and the general public on sexual assault;

“Sexual assault program” means a program that provides sexual assault program services; and

“Sexual assault program services” means free sexual assault crisis intervention provided by a community-based program to persons who have been victims of a sexual assault and to their families and friends.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

71-6-303. Powers and duties of department.

In administrating these programs, the department:

Shall establish an advisory committee, which shall review all program criteria adopted by the department and advise the commissioner relative to the allocation of funds under this part. The committee shall consist of five (5) members, one (1) of whom should be a former client of a sexual assault program. Three (3) of the committee members shall be appointed by the commissioner of the department with consent and approval of the governor. Two (2) of the advisory committee members shall be appointed by the governor from among persons recommended by the Tennessee coalition against domestic and sexual violence. Each committee member shall be selected for a four-year term and may be selected to serve successive terms. Committee members shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses in attending meetings, with travel expenses to be reimbursed in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter;

May not disburse more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from state funds provided under this part to any one (1) sexual assault program in one (1) fiscal year in order to assure that funds are distributed statewide, unless the department finds that exceeding the fifty thousand dollar ($50,000) guideline is warranted by the availability of funds, the area served by the provider, or the best interests of the citizens served by the program;

Shall accept any federal funds that may be available for use in carrying out this part and may use state funds, in addition to the funds allocated under this part, as matching funds for federal funds if matching funds are required;

May expend only those actual amounts, including travel expenses for advisory committee members, reasonably necessary for administration of the funds provided under this part;

Shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, necessary to carry out the purposes of this part related to the programs under its jurisdiction. The department shall, upon recommendation of its advisory committee, establish standards for operation of the services including establishment of a timetable for application and disbursement of funds; and

Shall require an annual report from each service funded, which shall include, in addition to all information required by the department, statistics on the number of persons requesting service, the number of persons served, the type of service rendered and a description of the social and economic characteristics of the person served and the number and type of referrals, including medical, legal, and educational services, made to other community resources. No information contained in the report shall identify any person served or enable any person to determine the identity of such a person.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

71-6-304. Prerequisites to receiving funds.

To receive funds under this part, organizations shall:

Be incorporated as a not-for-profit corporation, and be tax-exempt under § 501 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501); and

Comply with §§ 37-1-403 and 37-1-605 by reporting cases of suspected child abuse and neglect or child sexual abuse to the department of children's services and comply with § 71-6-103 by reporting suspected cases of adult abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or exploitation to the department of human services.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

71-6-305. Prerequisites for sexual assault programs.

To receive funds under this part for sexual assault program services, all applicants shall show that they have provided sexual assault program services for at least six (6) months prior to the application for funds under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

71-6-306. Necessary expenses of advisory committee.

A portion of the funds generated from the additional fine imposed upon persons convicted of sexual offenses pursuant to §40-24-108 shall be used to pay the necessary expenses for any meetings of the advisory committee established by this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.

71-6-307. Equal distribution of funds.

Funds distributed under this part shall be distributed as equally as possible to serve all geographic areas of the state.

Acts 2003, ch. 304, § 2.